Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
ARTICLE 105
OFFICE AND AGENT

Cross references:

For definitions applicable to this article, see §§ 7-90-102 and 7-101-401.

Section

7-105-101. Registered office and registered agent.

Part 7 of article 90 of this title, providing for registered agents and service of process, applies to corporations incorporated under or subject to articles 101 to 117 of this title.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2003, p. 2315, § 225, effective July 1, 2004.)

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article added, p. 751, § 1, effective July 1, 1994.

L. 2003:

Entire section amended, p. 2315, § 225, effective July 1, 2004.

7-105-102. Change of registered office or registered agent - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article added, p. 751, § 1, effective July 1, 1994.

L. 2000:

(1)(a) amended, p. 978, § 54, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

IP(1), (1)(e), and (2) amended, p. 1847, § 106, effective July 1; IP(1), (1)(e), and (2) amended, p. 1711, § 106, effective October 1.

L. 2003:

(3) added by revision, pp. 2356, 2357, §§ 347, 348.

Editor's note:

Subsection (3) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 2004. (See L. 2003, pp. 2356, 2357.)

7-105-103. Resignation of registered agent - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article added, p. 752, § 1, effective July 1, 1994.

L. 96:

(2) amended, p. 1314, § 13, effective June 1.

L. 2002:

(1) and (2) amended, p. 1847, § 107, effective July 1; (1) and (2) amended, p. 1712, § 107, effective October 1.

L. 2003:

(4) added by revision, pp. 2356, 2357, §§ 347, 348.

Editor's note:

Subsection (4) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 2004. (See L. 2003, pp. 2356, 2357.)

7-105-104. Service on corporation - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article added, p. 752, § 1, effective July 1, 1994.

L. 2003:

(4) added by revision, pp. 2356, 2357, §§ 347, 348.

Editor's note:

Subsection (4) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 2004. (See L. 2003, pp. 2356, 2357.)